Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB87.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 10 of the act of May 3, 1933 (P.L.242, No.86), referred to as the Cosmetology Law, is amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTIONS 4(A) AND 10 OF THE ACT OF MAY 3, 1933 (P.L.242, NO.86), REFERRED TO AS THE COSMETOLOGY LAW, ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 4. ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR EXAMINATION.--(A) NO PERSON SHALL BE PERMITTED BY THE BOARD TO RECEIVE A LICENSE AS A COSMETOLOGIST UNLESS SUCH PERSON (1) SHALL BE AT LEAST <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122 SIXTEEN YEARS OF AGE AND OF GOOD MORAL CHARACTER AT THE TIME OF MAKING APPLICATION, AND (2) SHALL HAVE COMPLETED A TENTH GRADE EDUCATION OR THE EQUIVALENT THEREOF, OR IN LIEU OF SUCH EDUCATION OR THE EQUIVALENT THEREOF SHALL HAVE RECEIVED TRAINING FROM OR UNDER THE AUSPICES OF THE BUREAU OF REHABILITATION IN THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY, AND (3) SHALL HAVE EITHER (I) COMPLETED NOT LESS THAN ONE THOUSAND TWO HUNDRED FIFTY HOURS AS A STUDENT IN A DULY REGISTERED SCHOOL OF COSMETOLOGY AS HEREINAFTER PROVIDED IN THIS ACT, OR (II) SHALL HAVE BEEN REGISTERED AND SERVED AS AN APPRENTICE AT LEAST TWO THOUSAND HOURS IN A LICENSED COSMETOLOGY SALON AS HEREINAFTER PROVIDED IN THIS ACT. THE APPLICATION SHALL BE ACCOMPANIED BY A NOTARIZED STATEMENT FROM EITHER THE LICENSED COSMETOLOGY SCHOOL THE APPLICANT ATTENDED OR THE LICENSED COSMETOLOGY TEACHER OR LICENSED COSMETOLOGIST WHO SERVED AS THE INSTRUCTOR IN THE LICENSED COSMETOLOGY SALON WHERE THE APPLICANT STUDIED AND TRAINED, STATING THAT THE APPLICANT HAS COMPLETED THE STUDY AND TRAINING PERIOD REQUIRED UNDER THIS ACT.* * *Section 10. Apprentices in Cosmetology Salons.--Any cosmetologist who is a cosmetology salon owner, at least twenty-three years of age, who is a high school graduate or the equivalent thereof[,] and who has had at least [five] ten years experience as a licensed cosmetologist in Pennsylvania[, and] or who is a holder of a teacher's license WITH AT LEAST FIVE YEARS OF EXPERIENCE AS A LICENSED COSMETOLOGIST IN PENNSYLVANIA, may instruct apprentices in a duly licensed cosmetology salon, provided that there shall be no less than two licensed cosmetologists in addition to the teacher OR A LICENSED COSMETOLOGIST SERVING AS AN INSTRUCTOR for each apprentice in 20250HB0087PN1618 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any salon and there shall be no more than two apprentices in any salon, and provided such salon is not held out as a school of cosmetology and provided each teacher OR COSMETOLOGIST instructing an apprentice shall report quarterly hours to the board on a form provided by the board. Such apprentices may apply for examination at the end of their apprenticeship at the next regular examination held by the board, and, if successful therein, shall be licensed as cosmetologists. Registered apprentices upon completion of their required term of apprenticeship, may apply for, and receive from the department, a temporary permit to practice in the field of cosmetology until the next regular examination. Nothing in this act shall prohibit an owner from hiring a cosmetology teacher to instruct apprentices.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0087PN1618 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415